Kentucky statutes. TITLE XVI Motor Vehicles
Penalties

186A.990.
Penalties.

Any person who knowingly gives false, fraudulent, or erroneous information in connection with an application for the registration, and when required, titling of a vehicle, or any application for assignment of a vehicle identification number, or replacement documents, or gives information in connection with his review of applications, or falsely certifies the truthfulness and accuracy of information supplied in connection with the registration and when required, titling of a vehicle, shall be guilty of forgery in the second degree.

Any person who violates KRS

186A.260

or KRS

186A.275

to

186A.285

shall be guilty of a Class D felony.

Any person who violates KRS

186A.300

to

186A.315

shall be guilty of a Class D felony.

Any person who operates a motor vehicle or trailer upon the highways of this state without a temporary tag when one is required, or with one that is expired, improperly executed, or displayed on a vehicle other than the one (1) to which it was legitimately and lawfully issued, shall be guilty of a Class B misdemeanor.

Any person who violates the disclosure provisions of KRS 186A.530(8) shall be guilty of a Class A misdemeanor.

Any person who violates any provisions of this chapter, or regulations promulgated pursuant thereto, and for which a specific penalty is not prescribed by statute, shall be guilty of a Class A misdemeanor.

Criminal remedies or sanctions provided in this chapter are in addition to, and not exclusive of, any other criminal remedies or sanctions provided elsewhere in the statutes.

History.

Enact. Acts 1982, ch. 164, § 66, effective July 15, 1982; 1994, ch. 243, § 7, effective July 15, 1994; 2005, ch. 22, § 2, effective June 20, 2005.